Oklahoma, session 2026, SB931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 204 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Account” means a digital profile on a social media platform
that is created by a user;
2. “Connected account” means an account on the social media
platform that is directly connected to:
a. the minor user’s account, or
b. an account that is directly connected to an account
directly connected to the minor’s account;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB931 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. “Content” means any information, visual depictions, tools,
features, links, software, or other materials that appear on or are
available or enabled through a social media platform;
4. “Directly connected” means an account on the social media
platform that is connected to another account by:
a. sending a request to connect to another account holder
and having the request to connect accepted by the
other account holder, or
b. receiving a request to connect from another account
holder and accepting the request to connect;
5. “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of
age;
6. “Personal information” means information that is linked or
can be reasonably linked to an individual, including, but not
limited to:
a. first and last name,
b. date of birth,
c. home or physical address, including street name and
city,
d. screen name or username that reveals an individual’s
email address, first name, or last name,
e. telephone number,
f. Social Security number,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB931 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

g. photograph, video, or audio file containing a person’s
image or voice,
h. geolocation information sufficient to identify street
name and city, and
i. any other identifier that a person may use to contact
a specific individual;
7. “Push notification” means an automatic electronic message
displayed on an account holder’s device, when the user interface for
the social media service is not actively open or visible on the
device, that prompts the account holder to check or engage with the
social media platform;
8. “Social media platform” means a website or internet medium
that:
a. permits a person to become a registered user,
establish an account, or create a profile for the
purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view
user-generated content through such an account or
profile,
b. enables one or more users to generate content that can
be viewed by other users of the medium, and
c. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact
with content generated by other users of the medium;
and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB931 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

9. “User” means an individual who accesses or uses a social
media platform.
B. 1. A social media platform shall perform reasonable age
verification methods to determine whether a user who is a resident
of this state is a minor. A social media company shall segregate
any personal information gathered specifically for reasonable age
verification purposes and shall not use the personal information for
any other purpose except those provided in subparagraphs a through f
of paragraph 2 of subsection D of this section.
2. If a user is determined to be a minor, a social media
platform shall:
a. set default privacy settings to prioritize maximum
privacy of such minor user’s account, including
settings that:
(1) restrict the visibility of the minor user’s
account to only connected accounts,
(2) limit the minor user’s ability to share content
to only connected accounts,
(3) restrict any data collection and sale of data
from a minor user’s account that is not otherwise
required for core functioning of the social media
platform,
(4) disable search engine indexing of the minor
user’s profiles,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB931 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(5) restrict a minor user’s direct messaging
capabilities to only allow for direct messaging
to connected accounts, and
(6) allow a minor user to download a file with all
information associated with his or her account,
b. implement and maintain reasonable security measures,
including data encryption, to protect the
confidentiality, security, and integrity of personal
information collected from a minor user who is a
resident of this state,
c. provide an easily accessible and understandable notice
that:
(1) describes any information the social media
platform collects from a minor user, and
(2) explains how the information may be used or
disclosed, and
d. disable the following features that prolong engagement
on a social media platform by a minor user:
(1) autoplay functions that continuously play content
without user interaction,
(2) scroll or pagination that loads additional
content as long as the user continues scrolling,
and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB931 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(3) push notifications prompting repeated user
engagement.
3. Upon request of a minor user, a social media platform shall:
a. delete the personal information of the minor user,
unless the information is required to be retained
pursuant to state or federal law, and
b. remove any information or material the minor user made
publicly available through the social media platform.
C. A social media company shall offer supervisory tools for a
minor user that the minor user may decide to activate. Such
supervisory tools shall include capabilities for a parent or legal
guardian of the minor user to:
1. Set time limits for the minor user’s daily social media
service usage across devices;
2. Schedule mandatory breaks for the minor user during selected
days and times across devices;
3. View:
a. data detailing the minor user’s total and average
daily time spent on the social media platform across
devices,
b. a list of connected accounts,
c. a list of accounts blocked by the minor user, and
d. the minor user’s:
(1) privacy settings,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB931 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(2) content sensitivity settings, and
(3) direct messaging settings and permissions; and
4. Receive notifications when the minor user changes an account
setting described in this subsection.
D. 1. A social media platform shall not allow a minor user who
is a resident of this state to change the default data privacy
setting provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of subsection
B of this section without first obtaining verifiable written consent
from a minor user’s parent or legal guardian. The social media
platform shall verify the identity of the person consenting and the
relationship of the person consenting to the minor.
2. A social media platform’s terms of service related to a
minor user who is a resident of this state shall be presumed to
include an assurance of confidentiality for the minor user’s
personal information. The presumption of confidentiality may be
overcome if the social media platform obtains verifiable written
consent from a parent or legal guard of the minor user. The
presumption of confidentiality does not apply to a social media
platform’s internal use or external sharing of a minor user’s
personal information if the use or sharing is necessary to:
a. maintain or analyze functioning of the social media
service,
b. enable network communications,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB931 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. personalize the user’s experience based on the user’s
age and location,
d. display a username chosen by the minor user,
e. obtain reasonable age verification information as
required by paragraph 1 of subsection B of this
section, or
f. comply with the requirements of this act or any other
federal or state law.
E. A social media platform shall:
1. Implement a review process allowing a user to appeal his or
her age designation by submitting documentary evidence to establish
the user’s age range; and
2. Review evidence submitted by the user and make a
determination within thirty (30) days of submission of the evidence.
F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a text
messaging platform or a platform for which the primary purpose is
related to education or health care.
G. The Attorney General is authorized to bring a civil action
against a social media platform for a violation of the provisions of
this section and to seek injunctive relief or other appropriate
relief as determined by the court.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
February 27, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB931 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)